District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.20

Parental absence by reason of imprisonment.

When continued absence from the home is by reason of imprisonment, the Mayor shall verify the length of the prison term of the parent, ascertain the date the parent will be eligible for parole, determine whether the parent is employed under the Work Release Program and the amount of support payment made to the family if so employed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 520, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.20.